Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
Penalties

117.990.
Penalties.
[Repealed.]

117.995.
Penalties.

Any person appointed to serve as an election officer but who shall knowingly and willfully fail to serve and who is not excused by the county board of elections for the reasons specified in this chapter shall be guilty of a violation and shall be ineligible to serve as an election officer for a period of five (5) years.

Any county clerk or member of the county board of elections who knowingly and willfully violates any of the provisions of this chapter, including furnishing applications for absentee ballots, applications for federal provisional absentee ballots, and mail-in absentee ballots to persons other than those specified by the provisions of this chapter, and failure to type the name of the voter on the application form as required by the provisions of this chapter, shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

Any officer who willfully fails to prepare or furnish ballots, federal provisional ballots, federal provisional absentee ballots, or absentee ballots or fails to allow a qualified voter to cast his or her vote using voting equipment as required of the voter by this chapter shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

Any election officer who knowingly and willfully violates any of the provisions of this chapter, including failure to enforce the prohibition against electioneering established by KRS

117.235

, shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor for the first offense and a Class D felony for each subsequent offense.

Any person who violates KRS

117.0861

, or who signs a name other than his or her own on an application for an absentee ballot, the verification form for the ballot, an emergency absentee ballot affidavit, a voter or election official affirmation, or any person who votes an absentee ballot other than the one issued in his or her name, or any person who applies for the ballot for the use of anyone other than himself or herself or the person designated by the provisions of this chapter, or any person who makes a false statement on an application for an absentee ballot or on an emergency absentee ballot affidavit shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

Any person who violates any provision of KRS

117.235

or

117.236

related to prohibited activities during absentee voting or on election day, after he or she has been duly notified of the provisions by any precinct election officer, county clerk, deputy county clerk, or other law enforcement official, shall, for each offense, be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

Any person who knowingly and willfully prepares or assists in the preparation of an inaccurate or incomplete voter assistance form or fails to complete a voter assistance form when required shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor for the first offense and a Class D felony for each subsequent offense; however, if a voter has been permanently certified as requiring voting assistance, there shall be no offense for the failure of the voter to complete the form.

The members of a county board of elections who fail to provide the training to precinct election officers required by KRS 117.187(2) shall be subject to removal by the State Board of Elections.

Any local or state election official, including the Secretary of State, employees of the Secretary, and members of the State Board of Elections and their staff, who knowingly and willfully uses the voter registration roster in violation of KRS 117.025(3)(a) shall, for each offense, be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

Any person who knowingly and willfully violates KRS 45A.657(2) or KRS 65.014(2) shall, for a first offense, be guilty of a Class D felony. For a second or subsequent offense, the person shall be guilty of a Class C felony.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 62; 1978, ch. 71, § 4, effective June 17, 1978; 1978, ch. 224, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 287, § 11, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 341, § 34, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 48, § 34, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 476, Pt. V, § 303, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 65, § 4, effective March 19, 1992; 1994, ch. 394, § 19, effective July 15, 1994; 2008, ch. 79, § 7, effective July 15, 2008; 2019 ch. 23, § 4, effective March 19, 2019; 2020 ch. 89, § 26, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 197, § 46, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 23, § 5, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/14/2022). 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 23, sec. 6, provided that Act, which amended this statute, may be cited as the Stop Outside Influence Over Elections Act of 2022.

(7/13/90). The Act amending this
section prevails over the repeal and reenactment in House Bill 940, Acts ch.
476, pursuant to Section 653(1) of Acts ch. 476.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The penalty provision of subsection (1) of this section
authorizing a fine of not less than $100 nor more than $1,000, or imprisonment
in the county jail for not more than one year, or both, constitutes a misdemeanor,
both as to the fine and jail sentence.

OAG 79-519

.